n11.dix
<pardef n="xoVreV/_n">
        <e><p>
                <l>yu</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>galYu</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>yannu</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>galYannu</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>yiMxa</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>galYiMxa</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>geV</l>
				<r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="m"/></r>
		</p></e>		
		<e><p>
				<l>gAgi</l>
				<r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="m"/></r>
		</p></e>		
		<e><p>
				<l>goskara</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>galYigeV</l>
				<r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="m"/></r>
		</p></e>		
		<e><p>
				<l>galYigAgi</l>
				<r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="m"/></r>
		</p></e>		
		<e><p>
				<l>galYigoskara</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>ya deVseVyiMxa</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>galYa deVseVyiMxa</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>yiMxa</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>galYiMxa</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>ya</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>galYa</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>yalli</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>galYalli</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p></e>		
        <e><p>
                <l>yeV</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>galYeV</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p></e>
</pardef>
</pardefs>

<e lm="xoVreV"><i>xoVreV</i><par n="xoVreV/_n"/></e>
